Louisiana, session 2026, HB424.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:583.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§583.1. Effect of merger; local option election; Class B and C permits
A. When territory in which the sale of alcoholic beverages was prohibited by
local option election is annexed into a municipality permitting such sales, a permit
for the sale of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption shall not be issued
for any premises located within such annexed territory unless authorized by local
option election conducted in the ward or election district in which the premises were
located prior to annexation.
B. This Section shall apply only to Class B and Class C retail permits.
C. Nothing in this Section shall invalidate any permit issued prior to the
effective date of this Section.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-918 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 424